Utah statutes.
41-3-402.   Payoff of liens on motor vehicles traded in.
(1)  If a dealer takes a trade-in from a retail customer as part of the sale
or lease of a motor vehicle and there is an outstanding loan balance owing on
the trade-in, then the dealer, within 21 calendar days of the date of sale or
lease, or within 15 calendar days of receiving payment in full for the motor
vehicle it sold, whichever date is earlier, shall remit payment to the
lienholder sufficient to pay off the lien on the traded in motor vehicle,
unless the underlying contract of sale or lease contract has been rescinded
before expiration of the 21 days.
(2)  A lienholder who has been paid in full by a dealer in accordance with the
terms of this section shall deliver to the dealer a properly executed title
that releases the lien within:
(a)  one business day after the business day on which the funds are received
when the funds are in cash, cashier's check, certified check, teller's check,
or other certified source of funds;
(b)  three business days after the business day on which the funds are
received when the funds are in the form of a check drawn on a local
originating depository institution; or
(c)  six business days after the business day on which the funds are received
when the funds are in the form of a check drawn on a nonlocal originating
depository institution.
(3)  If the final day for performing an act under this section falls on a
Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, then the time for performance is
extended to the immediately following business day.
(4)  A dealer's failure to comply with the provisions of this section subjects
the dealer to the sanctions set forth in Section  41-3-701.
(5)  A person who trades in a motor vehicle to a dealer and who thereafter
sustains loss or damage as a result of a dealer's failure to pay off a
properly recorded lien on the traded in motor vehicle within the time
specified by Subsection (1)(b), may bring an action against the offending
dealer to recover damages proximately caused by the dealer's failure to comply
with the provisions of this section, together with costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees.
